Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 4. Statewide Independent Living Council.

Sec. 47.80.300.
Statewide independent living council.

There is established the Statewide Independent Living Council. For budgetary purposes, the council is located in the department. The department shall provide reasonable and necessary professional and technical assistance when requested by the council.

History.

(§ 2 ch 66 SLA 1995; am § 81 ch 58 SLA 1999; am E.O. No. 117, § 2 (2016))

Cross references. —

For the governor's transmittal letter for Executive Order 117 which amended this section, see 2016 Senate Journal 1579 — 1580.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “department” for “department of labor and workforce development” two times. E.O. No. 117, § 3, provides that the 2016 amendment to this section takes “effect July 1, 2016.” However, E.O. No. 117 was signed by the governor July 28, 2016.

Sec. 47.80.310.
Composition; terms; compensation.

The governor shall appoint members to the council who meet the applicable requirements of 29 U.S.C. 796d after soliciting personal applications and after soliciting recommendations from the public, from organizations representing a broad range of individuals experiencing disabilities, and from organizations interested in individuals experiencing disabilities. The council shall select a chairperson from among its voting members.

The members shall be appointed to staggered terms of three years, except that a person appointed to fill a vacancy shall be appointed for the remaining years of the prior member’s term. A member may not serve more than two consecutive full terms. Notwithstanding their terms of office, the members serve at the pleasure of the governor.

Members of the council who are not state employees are entitled to per diem and travel expenses as authorized for members of boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

. In addition, if required by federal law, a member is entitled to

reimbursement of the necessary expenses of attending council meetings and performing council duties, including expenses for child care and personal assistance services;

compensation of up to $150 for each day of performing council duties and each day spent traveling to attend a council meeting if the member is not employed or must forfeit wages from other employment in order to perform council duties or travel to a council meeting.

History.

(§ 2 ch 66 SLA 1995)

Cross references. —

For appointments of initial members of Statewide Independent Living Council, see § 3, ch. 66, SLA 1995 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 47.80.320.
Powers and duties.

The council shall perform the duties set out in 29 U.S.C. 796d in a manner that will maximize the state’s receipt of federal financial assistance for independent living services and centers of independent living for residents with severe disabilities, including the following duties:

joint development of the state plan required under 29 U.S.C. 796c and evaluation of the implementation of the plan;

development of a plan for the provision of resources, including staff and personnel, that may be necessary to carry out the council’s functions with funds from the federal government and other public and private sources; and

coordination of the council’s activities with other state agencies that address the needs of specific disability populations and issues under federal law.

The council may

hold hearings and forums as determined by the council to be necessary to carry out its duties;

solicit and accept money or other resources on behalf of the state from any public or private source.

History.

(§ 2 ch 66 SLA 1995)

Sec. 47.80.330.
Definition.

Notwithstanding AS

47.80.900

, in AS

47.80.300

—

47.80.320

, “council” means the Statewide Independent Living Council established under AS

47.80.300

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 66 SLA 1995)